Utah statutes.
72-4-202.   Legacy Loop Highway.

(1)  There is established the Legacy Loop Highway comprising the existing highway from Route 15 south of St. George, northerly on Route 18 to Route 56 at Beryl Junction, then easterly on Route 56 to Route 130 in Cedar City, and then northeasterly on Route 130 and county routes 1788 and 1786 to Route 143 in Parowan.

(2)  The Department of Transportation shall designate the portions of the highways identified in Subsection (1) as the Legacy Loop Highway on all future state highway maps.

